District of Columbia statutes.
47-2848

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is declared unconstitutional or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the chapter and the applicability of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 50
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 563, ch. 366
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(i), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-2349.
1981 Ed., § 47-2848.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.